New Jersey, session 222, S2682.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Commencing two years after the effective date of this act, every hospital that provides inpatient maternity services shall, as a condition of continuing to provide inpatient maternity services, maintain both a Baby-Friendly Hospital designation issued by Baby-Friendly USA and a Mother-Friendly Hospital designation issued by the Improving Birth Coalition. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.